North Dakota, session 69, HB1409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 32-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Interest defined.
Interest must be liberally interpreted. An interest may be a legal interest or an equitable
interest. An interested party in a judicial action is a party that has a legal interest or an equitable
interest in the subject property or subject rights of a civil or criminal action. A party with an
equitable interest in a property, civil right, or right is a party whose benefit, property, or rights
may be affected by a decision in a judicial action. A party with a legal interest in property or
rights may be represented by a party who has an equitable interest in the subject property or
rights of a judicial action.
Page No. 1 25.0893.02000